Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.165

Housing for farmworkers—Proposal review and funding recommendations—Farmworker housing advisory group.

(1) The department shall work with the advisory group established in subsection (2) of this section to review proposals and make prioritized funding recommendations to the department or funding approval board that oversees the distribution of housing trust fund grants and loans to be used for the development, maintenance, and operation of housing for low-income farmworkers.

(2) A farmworker housing advisory group representing growers, farmworkers, and other interested parties shall be formed to assist the department in the review and priority funding recommendations under this section.

[ 1998 c 37 s 8.]